src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NOUNS 
  NA_DEF ;
  NA_C ;
  NA_CA ;
  NA_COO ;
  NA_CW ;
  NA_CWA ;
  NA_CY ;
  NA_NY ;
  NA_VV ;
  NA_VVW ;
  NA_VVY ;
  NA_VW ;
  NA_VY ;

  NI_DEF ;
  NI_AA ;
  NI_C ;
  NI_COO ;
  NI_CY ;
  NI_VV ;

LEXICON NA_CA 
nika    NA_FLAG    "Canada goose" ; !line:8265, word:w7401w, sense:s68908757511s


LEXICON NA_CWA 
ikwa    NA_FLAG    "louse" ; !line:5339, word:w4775w, sense:s68908754852s
makwa    NA_FLAG    "bear" ; !line:6394, word:w5709w, sense:s68908755802s
Makwa    NA_FLAG    "identified by Warren (1885:44) as one of the Ojibwe clans, translated as 'Bear'" ; !line:12021, word:w72553084553w, sense:s72553085200s


LEXICON NA_CY 
achaab    NA_FLAG    "bow" ; !line:435, word:w371w, sense:s68908750396s
apwaaganisin    NA_FLAG    "soapstone, gray or black pipestone" ; !line:1105, word:w959w, sense:s68908750993s
asab    NA_FLAG    "net" ; !line:1108, word:w962w, sense:s68908750996s
asesab    NA_FLAG    "dogwood?" ; !line:1128, word:w982w, sense:s68908751015s
asin    NA_FLAG    "rock, stone" ; !line:1171, word:w1021w, sense:s68908751055s
asinaab    NA_FLAG    "net sinker, anchor" ; !line:1172, word:w1022w, sense:s68908751056s
baabiitawaabikosin    NA_FLAG    "mica" ; !line:1345, word:w1159w, sense:s68908751199s
baaginewasin    NA_FLAG    "round stone hurled by Thunder Birds in lightning" ; !line:1372, word:w1184w, sense:s68908751224s
baapaatewasin    NA_FLAG    "spotted rock" ; !line:1456, word:w1263w, sense:s68908751304s
baapiitawasin    NA_FLAG    "asbestos" ; !line:1471, word:w1278w, sense:s68908751319s
Bashkwadaash    NA_FLAG    "Hairless (name of the first dog given to humans by ¬´Misaabe¬�"! in a traditional story)" ; !line:2035, word:w70145398228w, sense:s70145399085s
biitowaabik    NA_FLAG    "flat rock that breaks into flat layers" ; !line:2588, word:w2294w, sense:s68908752345s
biiwaabikosin    NA_FLAG    "black rock with pebbles embedded in it" ; !line:2598, word:w2303w, sense:s68908752354s
biiwaanagosin    NA_FLAG    "flint rock" ; !line:2605, word:w2310w, sense:s68908752361s
bikwaakodogin    NA_FLAG    "round rosehip fruit" ; !line:2648, word:w2350w, sense:s68908752401s
gaakaawaskosin    NA_FLAG    "mica or fool's gold" ; !line:3895, word:w3477w, sense:s68908753538s
gaashaabikosin    NA_FLAG    "stone used for filing knives, etc." ; !line:3938, word:w3514w, sense:s68908753576s
makadewaabikosin    NA_FLAG    "hard black rock" ; !line:6344, word:w5662w, sense:s68908755755s
mikom    NA_FLAG    "ice" ; !line:6904, word:w6183w, sense:s68908756277s
mikwam    NA_FLAG    "ice" ; !line:6917, word:w70112144686w, sense:s70112147486s
miskosin    NA_FLAG    "dark red rock" ; !line:7200, word:w6449w, sense:s68908756547s
miskosin    NA_FLAG    "pink granite" ; !line:7201, word:w6450w, sense:s68908756548s
miskwaabikosin    NA_FLAG    "hard dark-red rock" ; !line:7214, word:w6463w, sense:s68908756561s
mitigwaab    NA_FLAG    "bow" ; !line:7290, word:w6530w, sense:s68908756628s
nadowasin    NA_FLAG    "purple-red rock" ; !line:7720, word:w6927w, sense:s68908757026s
namewasab    NA_FLAG    "sturgeon net" ; !line:7792, word:w6992w, sense:s68908757091s
odapin    NA_FLAG    "small root" ; !line:8784, word:w7799w, sense:s68908757969s
odasabikesiwasab    NA_FLAG    "spider net, spider web" ; !line:8786, word:w7801w, sense:s68908757971s
ogin    NA_FLAG    "tomato" ; !line:8876, word:w7895w, sense:s70248932772s
opin    NA_FLAG    "potato" ; !line:9303, word:w10055w, sense:s68908760089s
oshkasab    NA_FLAG    "new net" ; !line:9325, word:w8323w, sense:s68908758465s
ozaawasin    NA_FLAG    "dark brownish-purple rock" ; !line:9449, word:w8441w, sense:s68908758576s
ozaawi-zhooniyaawasin    NA_FLAG    "gold" ; !line:9452, word:w8443w, sense:s68908758578s
ozhaawashkosin    NA_FLAG    "blue-grey hard rock" ; !line:9485, word:w8476w, sense:s68908758610s
ozhigaagomizh    NA_FLAG    "onion" ; !line:9518, word:w8508w, sense:s68908758642s
waabaabikosin    NA_FLAG    "hard white clay-like rock" ; !line:9576, word:w8560w, sense:s68908758694s
waabi-zhooniyaawasin    NA_FLAG    "silver" ; !line:9621, word:w8603w, sense:s68908758737s
waabiganasin    NA_FLAG    "shale" ; !line:9631, word:w8613w, sense:s68908758747s
waasikwanesin    NA_FLAG    "phosphorus" ; !line:9817, word:w8782w, sense:s68908758918s
wiigob    NA_FLAG    "willow type" ; !line:10129, word:w9055w, sense:s68908759192s
zhingob    NA_FLAG    "white spruce" ; !line:10936, word:w9799w, sense:s70128959838s
zhooniyaawasin    NA_FLAG    "granite (where gold is found)" ; !line:10964, word:w9825w, sense:s68908759962s
ajijaakopin    NA_FLAG    "crane potato (a large, edible root, growing in the water)" ; !line:11258, word:w72331118893w, sense:s72331120846s
Gizhe-Manidoo Weyoosimind    NA_FLAG    "God the Father" ; !line:11680, word:w72374367129w, sense:s72374368120s
Wenizhishid Manidoo    NA_FLAG    "the Holy Spirit, the third member of the trinity, God the Spirit" ; !line:11681, word:w72374441664w, sense:s72374442499s


LEXICON NA_NY 
abinoojiinh    NA_FLAG    "child" ; !line:413, word:w70123931237w, sense:s70123931813s
giigoonh    NA_FLAG    "fish" ; !line:4545, word:w70124519926w, sense:s70124520460s
mindimooyenh    NA_FLAG    "old woman" ; !line:6952, word:w10027w, sense:s68908756323s
waawaabiganoojiinh    NA_FLAG    "mouse" ; !line:9835, word:w10058w, sense:s68908760092s
zhiiwitaagani-giigoonh    NA_FLAG    "salted fish" ; !line:10917, word:w70124561809w, sense:s70124563295s
adisawayeshiinh    NA_FLAG    "a kind of large grasshopper, a locust (Fr. cigale)" ; !line:11250, word:w72328130942w, sense:s72328133386s
zenibaanh    NA_FLAG    "ribbon" ; !line:11347, word:w72337917459w, sense:s72337918001s
Manoominikeshiinh    NA_FLAG    "From Warren 1885, a subgroup of the Ojibwes, described by him as 'Rice makers, who live on the Rice lakes on the St. Croix River'" ; !line:12012, word:w72552972993w, sense:s72552976553s


LEXICON NA_VVW 
ikwe    NA_FLAG    "woman" ; !line:5345, word:w4781w, sense:s68908754858s
ikwe-bizhiki    NA_FLAG    "cow (female)" ; !line:11957, word:w72524211762w, sense:s72524212608s


LEXICON NA_VVY 
abinoojii    NA_FLAG    "child" ; !line:412, word:w70140194621w, sense:s70140195098s


LEXICON NA_VY 
akiwenzii    NA_FLAG    "old man" ; !line:682, word:w9981w, sense:s68908750624s
apichikiwenzi    NA_FLAG    "type of Canada goose" ; !line:1044, word:w908w, sense:s68908750939s
awesii    NA_FLAG    "animal, game-animal" ; !line:1238, word:w70155251580w, sense:s70155251936s

LEXICON NA_FLAG 
+N:0  NA_PRE_INFL_FLAG ;

LEXICON NA_PRE_INFL_FLAG 
@P.Animate.1@   N_CON_DIM ;




LEXICON NI_AA 
mashkimod    NI_FLAG    "bag" ; !line:6576, word:w5875w, sense:s68908755968s


LEXICON NI_FLAG 
+N:0  NI_PREINFL_FLAG ;

LEXICON NI_PREINFL_FLAG 
@P.Animate.0@   N_CON_DIM ;

LEXICON NA_DEF 
Bizhiw    NA_FLAG    "identified by Warren (1885:44) as one of the Ojibwe clans, translated as 'Lynx'" ; !line:12027, word:w72553106196w, sense:s72553106801s
LEXICON NA_C 
abwewin    NA_FLAG    "frying pan" ; !line:429, word:w365w, sense:s68908750390s
ashigaw    NA_FLAG    "pelican" ; !line:1144, word:w997w, sense:s68908751030s
biindaabika'igan    NA_FLAG    "oven" ; !line:2468, word:w2188w, sense:s68908752236s
dagwaagishib    NA_FLAG    "American black duck" ; !line:3241, word:w2899w, sense:s68908752954s
gibojaako'ogwan    NA_FLAG    "blue dragonfly" ; !line:4371, word:w3915w, sense:s68908753977s
gikino'amawaagan    NA_FLAG    "student, learner, disciple" ; !line:4805, word:w4306w, sense:s68908754374s
izhinizha'amaadiwin    NA_FLAG    "a being sent against another in traditional conjuring" ; !line:5721, word:w70112790906w, sense:s70112792422s
makadewiingwebakwezhigan    NA_FLAG    "pancake" ; !line:6364, word:w5681w, sense:s68908755774s
mishiimin    NA_FLAG    "apple" ; !line:7153, word:w6405w, sense:s68908756503s
namegos    NA_FLAG    "lake trout, salmon" ; !line:7783, word:w6983w, sense:s68908757082s
odisiikaanens    NA_FLAG    "radish" ; !line:8811, word:w7828w, sense:s68908757993s
ozaaw'ogaans    NA_FLAG    "yellow pickerel" ; !line:9429, word:w8423w, sense:s68908758558s
wazhashkwayaan    NA_FLAG    "muskrat hide" ; !line:10020, word:w8959w, sense:s68908759095s
zhaangweshiwayaan    NA_FLAG    "mink hide" ; !line:10671, word:w9549w, sense:s68908759685s
zhingobiins    NA_FLAG    "cedar bough" ; !line:11842, word:w72496116917w, sense:s72496117594s
LEXICON NA_COO 
biiwaanag    NA_FLAG    "flint" ; !line:2602, word:w2307w, sense:s68908752358s
madogaanaatig    NA_FLAG    "tipi pole" ; !line:6214, word:w5540w, sense:s68908755632s
nooka'iganaabik    NA_FLAG    "smooth black rock used for pounding dried meat" ; !line:8616, word:w7644w, sense:s68908757816s
zesegaandag    NA_FLAG    "black spruce" ; !line:10582, word:w9466w, sense:s68908759601s
LEXICON NA_CW 
beshk    NA_FLAG    "common nighthawk" ; !line:2169, word:w1914w, sense:s68908751960s
noozhemik    NA_FLAG    "female beaver" ; !line:8705, word:w7727w, sense:s68908757901s
LEXICON NA_VV 
ajijaakoshimoo    NA_FLAG    "red-breasted nuthatch" ; !line:653, word:w571w, sense:s68908750597s
gichi-anishinaabe    NA_FLAG    "elder" ; !line:4395, word:w3936w, sense:s68908753999s
manoominigimaa    NA_FLAG    "wild rice garden tender" ; !line:6514, word:w5817w, sense:s68908755910s
odoodemimaa    NA_FLAG    "clan animal" ; !line:8821, word:w7838w, sense:s68908758003s
aa'aawe    NA_FLAG    "pigeon-tail (a kind of wild duck)" ; !line:11123, word:w72316760086w, sense:s72316762071s
LEXICON NA_VW 
gaawendamoosi    NA_FLAG    "burdock (a kind of plant)" ; !line:3991, word:w3566w, sense:s68908753628s
oshkiniigi    NA_FLAG    "young male (teenager)" ; !line:9362, word:w8358w, sense:s68908758498s
LEXICON NI_DEF 
gwaapii    NI_FLAG    "coffee" ; !line:5174, word:w4635w, sense:s68908754707s
wiinin    NI_FLAG    "fat" ; !line:10252, word:w9165w, sense:s68908759303s
LEXICON NI_C 
aamoo-wazason    NI_FLAG    "beehive" ; !line:207, word:w183w, sense:s68908750204s
agochigan    NI_FLAG    "trim" ; !line:554, word:w479w, sense:s68908750504s
anwiiwizhens    NI_FLAG    "gun cartridge" ; !line:1009, word:w877w, sense:s68908750908s
azhigan    NI_FLAG    "foot wrappings" ; !line:1328, word:w1145w, sense:s68908751185s
bakeziibiins    NI_FLAG    "small tributary" ; !line:1830, word:w1607w, sense:s68908751649s
biindwewesijigan    NI_FLAG    "tape recorder" ; !line:2505, word:w2218w, sense:s68908752268s
bimiwanen    NI_FLAG    "backpack, pack" ; !line:2801, word:w69040407012w, sense:s69040407829s
dawaaka'igan    NI_FLAG    "forest trail" ; !line:3392, word:w3035w, sense:s68908753093s
gaasiinaaganaan    NI_FLAG    "dishtowel" ; !line:3972, word:w3547w, sense:s68908753609s
gichiwaakwa'igan    NI_FLAG    "C-clamp" ; !line:4459, word:w3992w, sense:s68908754056s
giziinjaaninaagan    NI_FLAG    "wash basin" ; !line:5039, word:w4523w, sense:s68908754591s
jiibayi-makak    NI_FLAG    "coffin" ; !line:5835, word:w5199w, sense:s68908755287s
magood    NI_FLAG    "dress, skirt" ; !line:6271, word:w5596w, sense:s68908755688s
mazinibii'igan    NI_FLAG    "painting, drawing" ; !line:6658, word:w5955w, sense:s68908756049s
naanaajibizon    NI_FLAG    "suspenders?" ; !line:7566, word:w6786w, sense:s68908756885s
odow    NI_FLAG    "blood clot" ; !line:8829, word:w7849w, sense:s68908758011s
otigwaanigegan    NI_FLAG    "skull" ; !line:9395, word:w8392w, sense:s68908758528s
wanii'igewin    NI_FLAG    "trapline" ; !line:9942, word:w8894w, sense:s68908759030s
zhiibiigwayaw    NI_FLAG    "turtle-neck sweater" ; !line:10869, word:w9735w, sense:s68908759872s
negwaakwaan    NI_FLAG    "tap for tapping maple trees" ; !line:11787, word:w72462482254w, sense:s72462484041s
LEXICON NI_COO 
basegaanashk    NI_FLAG    "cattail" ; !line:2008, word:w1777w, sense:s68908751821s
ishkwaandemaabik    NI_FLAG    "doorknob" ; !line:5563, word:w4954w, sense:s68908755037s
nookijiisag    NI_FLAG    "soft rotten log" ; !line:8630, word:w7658w, sense:s68908757830s
adoopowiniigin    NI_FLAG    "table-cloth" ; !line:11267, word:w72331289854w, sense:s72331290559s
LEXICON NI_CY 
nagwaaganeyaab    NI_FLAG    "snare wire" ; !line:7754, word:w6958w, sense:s68908757057s
LEXICON NI_VV 
daagisii    NI_FLAG    "taxi" ; !line:3131, word:w2802w, sense:s68908752855s
